Utah statutes.
4-32-2.   Purpose declaration.

(1)  It is the purpose of this chapter to provide a meat and poultry inspection program in the state at least equal to the programs imposed under the Federal Meat Inspection Act, the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act, and the Humane Slaughter Act.

(2)  The commissioner shall administer and enforce this chapter to accomplish this purpose.

